Hawaii statutes.
§657-4 Two years; libel and slander.
All actions for libel or slander shall be commenced within two years after the
cause of action accrued, and not after. [CC 1859, §1037; am imp L 1907, c 113,
§1; am L 1913, c 19, §1; RL 1925, §2642; RL 1935, §3913; RL 1945, §10424; RL
1955, §241-4; am L 1965, c 139, §2; HRS §657-4]

Case Notes

Portions of plaintiff's defamation claim based on defendant's
2007 report and alleged 2007 statements were time-barred, where plaintiff filed
the action in 2010. 892 F. Supp. 2d 1245 (2012).

Claim for defamation accrues when defamee discovers or
reasonably should have discovered publication. 65 H. 478, 653 P.2d 1155
(1982).

Distinguished from "general" personal injury
statute of limitations of §657-7. 73 H. 578, 837 P.2d 1247 (1992).

Cited: 42 H. 177, 179 (1957).

Mentioned: 817 F. Supp. 850 (1992).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next